Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5908
Cost of examinations.

The reasonable expenses of the examination of a company conducted under the Insurers Examination Act shall be fixed and determined by the director who shall collect the same from the company examined. The company shall reimburse the amount thereof upon presentation of a statement by the director. Reimbursement shall be limited to a reasonable allocation for the salary of each examiner plus actual expenses. All money collected by the director for examination of the affairs of companies shall be remitted in accordance with section 44-116.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 8.